Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.360

Proceedings when jury have agreed.

When the jury have agreed upon their verdict they shall be conducted into court by the officer having them in charge.

[ 2003 c 406 s 19; Code 1881 s 236; 1877 p 49 s 240; 1869 p 58 s 240; RRS s 356.]